District of Columbia statutes.
1-628.03

Courts.

The Public Employee Relations Board is authorized to enter into agreements with the courts of the District of Columbia to implement a positive program of employee-employer relations.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2803, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-629.3.
1973 Ed., § 1-358.3.